Missouri, session 2026, SB1330.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.013, 115.074, 115.078, 115.179,
115.181, 115.193, 115.221, and 115.642, RSMo, are repealed and
ten new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 115.013, 115.179, 115.181, 115.193, 115.220, 115.221,
115.642, 115.1500, 115.1505, and 115.1510, to read as follows:
115.013. As used in this chapter, unless the context
clearly implies otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Air-gap" or "air-gapped", a security measure in
which equipment is physically and technically isolated from
any network and is not directly connected to the internet
nor is it connected to any other system that is connected to
the internet. Data can only be passed to an air-gapped
device physically via a USB or other removable media;
(2) "Automatic tabulating equipment", the apparatus
necessary to examine and automatically count votes, and the
data processing machines which are used for counting votes
and tabulating results and which are air-gapped and not
physically able to be connected to a network;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1330 2
(3) "Ballot", the paper ballot, or ballot designed
for use with an electronic voting system on which each voter
may cast all votes to which he or she is entitled at an
election;
(4) "Ballot label", the card, paper, booklet, page, or
other material containing the names of all offices and
candidates and statements of all questions to be voted on;
(5) "Counting location", a location selected by the
election authority for the automatic processing or counting,
or both, of ballots;
(6) "County", any county in this state or any city not
within a county;
(7) "Disqualified", a determination made by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the Missouri ethics commission, an
election authority or any other body authorized by law to
make such a determination that a candidate is ineligible to
hold office or not entitled to be voted on for office;
(8) "District", an area within the state or within a
political subdivision of the state from which a person is
elected to represent the area on a policy-making body with
representatives of other areas in the state or political
subdivision;
(9) "Electronic voting machine", any part of an air-
gapped electronic voting system on which a voter is able to
cast a ballot under this chapter;
(10) "Electronic voting system", a system of casting
votes by use of marking devices, and counting votes by use
of automatic air-gapped tabulating or air-gapped data
processing equipment, including computerized voting systems
that mark or tabulate ballots;
(11) "Established political party" for the state, a
political party which, at either of the last two general

SB 1330 3
elections, polled for its candidate for any statewide office
more than two percent of the entire vote cast for the
office. "Established political party" for any district or
political subdivision shall mean a political party which
polled more than two percent of the entire vote cast at
either of the last two elections in which the district or
political subdivision voted as a unit for the election of
officers or representatives to serve its area;
(12) "Federal office", the office of presidential
elector, United States senator, or representative in
Congress;
(13) "Independent", a candidate who is not a candidate
of any political party and who is running for an office for
which political party candidates may run;
(14) "Major political party", the political party
whose candidates received the highest or second highest
number of votes at the last general election;
(15) "Marking device", any device approved by the
secretary of state under section 115.225 which will enable
the votes to be counted by automatic tabulating equipment;
(16) "Municipal" or "municipality", a city, village,
or incorporated town of this state;
(17) "New party", any political group which has filed
a valid petition and is entitled to place its list of
candidates on the ballot at the next general or special
election;
(18) "Nonpartisan", a candidate who is not a candidate
of any political party and who is running for an office for
which party candidates may not run;
(19) "Political party", any established political
party and any new party;

SB 1330 4
(20) "Political subdivision", a county, city, town,
village, or township of a township organization county;
(21) "Polling place", the voting place designated for
all voters residing in one or more precincts for any
election;
(22) "Precincts", the geographical areas into which
the election authority divides its jurisdiction for the
purpose of conducting elections;
(23) "Public office", any office established by
constitution, statute or charter and any employment under
the United States, the state of Missouri, or any political
subdivision or special district thereof, but does not
include any office in the Missouri state defense force or
the National Guard or the office of notary public or city
attorney in cities of the third classification or cities of
the fourth classification;
(24) "Question", any measure on the ballot which can
be voted "YES" or "NO";
(25) "Relative within the second degree by
consanguinity or affinity", a spouse, parent, child,
grandparent, brother, sister, grandchild, mother-in-law,
father-in-law, daughter-in-law, or son-in-law;
(26) "Special district", any school district, water
100 district, fire protection district, hospital district,
101 health center, nursing district, or other districts with
102 taxing authority, or other district formed pursuant to the
103 laws of Missouri to provide limited, specific services;
104 (27) "Special election", elections called by any
105 school district, water district, fire protection district,
106 or other district formed pursuant to the laws of Missouri to
107 provide limited, specific services; and

SB 1330 5
108 (28) "Voter activity", registering to vote, voting in
109 an election, signing a petition to form a new political
110 party, signing a petition for the nomination of an
111 independent candidate for office, or signing an initiative
112 petition;
113 (29) "Voting district", the one or more precincts
114 within which all voters vote at a single polling place for
115 any election.
115.179. [1.] The election authority shall [have]
canvass the registration records of all precincts in its
jurisdiction [canvassed] every two years [in accordance with
subsection 3 of section 115.163 and that it]. Such canvass
shall be completed no later than ninety days prior to the
date of a primary or general election for federal office.
[The election authority may utilize postal service
contractors under the federal National Change of Address
program to canvass the records.
2. In each jurisdiction without a board of election
commissioners, the county clerk shall have the registration
records of all precincts in its jurisdiction canvassed every
two years in accordance with subsection 3 of section 115.163
and that it be completed no later than ninety days prior to
the date of a primary or general election for federal
office.]
115.181. 1. In its discretion, the election authority
may order all or any part of a canvass to be made using any
one of the following methods, or any combination thereof:
(1) House-to-house, pursuant to sections 115.185 and
115.187;
(2) Through the United States Postal Service, [or by
both methods] pursuant to section 115.189; or

SB 1330 6
(3) Through the utilization of postal service
contractors pursuant to the federal National Change of
Address program.
2. At the discretion of the election authority, [the]
a canvass may be made by including only those voters who did
not vote at the last general election and those voters who
registered since the last general election.
115.193. 1. Upon completion of a canvass as provided
for in this chapter, the election authority shall remove a
registered voter's name [shall not be removed] from the list
of registered voters on the precinct register on the ground
that the voter has changed residence [unless] if:
(1) The voter confirms in writing that the voter has
changed residence to a place outside the election
authority's jurisdiction in which the voter is registered; or
(2) The voter fails to respond to a notice described
in subsection 3 of this section and has not [voted in an
election] engaged in voter activity during the period
beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day
after the date of the second general election that occurs
after the date of the notice.
2. The notice referred to in subsection 1, subdivision
(2) of this section shall contain a postage prepaid and
preaddressed return card, sent by forwardable mail, on which
the voter may state the voter's current address.
3. The notice shall also contain the following
statements:
"(1) Any voter who has not changed his or her
residence, or has changed residence but remained in the same
election authority's jurisdiction, shall return the card not
later than the fourth Wednesday prior to the next election.
If the card is not returned by this date, oral or written

SB 1330 7
affirmation of the voter's address may be required at the
polling place before the voter will be permitted to vote in
an election during the period beginning on the date of the
notice and ending on the day after the date of the second
general election that occurs after the date of the notice.
Any voter who does not [vote in an election] engage in voter
activity during that period, will have his or her name
removed from the list of eligible voters;
(2) For additional information on registering to vote,
contact the election authority located in the county of your
current residence. If you reside in the City of St. Louis,
contact the St. Louis City election board."
4. If the election authority believes that the name of
any voter was improperly removed from the [registration
records] list of registered voters on the precinct register,
it may, by telephone or in writing on election day,
authorize election judges to permit the voter to vote. The
voter may be required to execute an affidavit of
qualification on a form prescribed by the election authority
before being permitted to vote.
5. An election authority may designate any voter as an
inactive voter if the election authority receives from the
United States Postal Service notification that the voter no
longer resides at the address last known to the election
authority and no forwarding address is available, or the
voter fails to respond to the notice authorized in
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section within
thirty days after the election authority sends such notice.
Such voter may be designated as an inactive voter only until:
(1) The voter returns such notice to the election
authority;

SB 1330 8
(2) The voter provides the election authority with his
or her new address pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter;
(3) The voter provides a written affirmation that the
voter has not changed residence; or
(4) The election authority receives sufficient
information to remove the voter from the list of registered
voters pursuant to this section or section 115.165, or
return the voter to the active list of registered voters in
the jurisdiction.
6. An election authority may exclude inactive voters
to determine only:
(1) The number of ballots to be printed pursuant to
section 115.247;
(2) The proportional costs of elections; or
(3) Mailing information to registered voters.
115.220. 1. State agencies shall provide to the
secretary of state, on a schedule to be determined by the
secretary of state, any information and data that the
secretary of state considers necessary to maintain the
statewide voter registration database established according
to section 115.158, except where prohibited by federal law
or federal regulation. The secretary of state shall ensure
that any information or data provided to the secretary of
state that is confidential in the possession of the entity
providing the data remains confidential while in the
possession of the secretary of state.
2. The secretary of state shall enter into agreements
to share information or data that is in the possession of
the secretary of state with other states or groups of
states, as the secretary of state considers necessary, to
maintain the statewide voter registration database. Except

SB 1330 9
as otherwise provided in this section, the secretary of
state shall ensure that any information or data provided to
the secretary of state that is confidential remains
confidential while in the possession of the secretary of
state.
3. The clerk of each circuit court shall, on or before
the tenth day of each month, prepare and transmit to the
secretary of state, in a format prescribed by the secretary
of state, a complete list of all persons, including
addresses, ages, and other identifying information as
specified by the secretary of state, who identify themselves
as not being citizens of the United States during their
qualification to serve as a juror during the preceding
calendar month in that county.
4. Upon receipt of the lists described in subsection 3
of this section, the secretary of state shall transmit the
names of such persons whose names appear on the list of
electors to the appropriate election authority who shall
remove all such names from the voter registration list and
shall mail a notice of such action and the reason therefor
to the last known address of such persons by first-class
mail.
115.221. [Notwithstanding any other provisions of law
to the contrary,]
1. Each election authority may [have] inspect the
voting records [inspected and may] of all precincts in its
jurisdiction.
2. (1) Each election authority shall investigate the
qualifications of any person who has not [voted] engaged in
voter activity or has transferred his or her registration
within the [four] two preceding calendar years.

SB 1330 10
(2) If an election authority determines that a
registered voter has not engaged in voter activity within
the two preceding calendar years, the election authority
shall include such registered voter in any canvass conducted
pursuant to section 115.181.
115.642. 1. [Any person may file a complaint with the
secretary of state stating the name of any person who has
violated any of the provisions of sections 115.629 to
115.646 and stating the facts of the alleged offense, sworn
to, under penalty of perjury.] There is hereby created the
"Office of Election Crimes and Security" within the office
of the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall
employ a director and investigators within the office,
subject to appropriation. The office shall have the
following duties:
(1) Responding to notifications and complaints
alleging a violation of this chapter;
(2) Reviewing notices and reports of alleged
violations of this chapter and conducting investigations as
deemed necessary;
(3) Initiating independent inquiries and conducting
investigations into alleged violations of this chapter; and
(4) Overseeing a voter fraud hotline.
2. The office shall review complaints and conduct
investigations into alleged violations of this chapter or
any rule adopted under this chapter. Within thirty days of
receiving a complaint, the [secretary of state] office shall
notify the person filing the complaint whether or not the
[secretary] office has dismissed the complaint or will
commence an investigation. The [secretary of state] office
shall dismiss frivolous complaints. For purposes of this
subsection, "frivolous complaint" shall mean an allegation

SB 1330 11
clearly lacking any basis in fact or law. [Any person who
makes a frivolous complaint pursuant to this section shall
be liable for actual and compensatory damages to the alleged
violator for holding the alleged violator before the public
in a false light. If reasonable grounds appear that the
alleged offense was committed, the secretary of state may
issue a probable cause statement. If the secretary of state
issues a probable cause statement, he or she may refer the
offense to the appropriate prosecuting attorney.]
3. [Notwithstanding the provisions of section 27.060,
56.060, or 56.430 to the contrary, when requested by the
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney, the secretary of
state or his or her authorized representatives may aid any
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney in the commencement
and prosecution of election offenses as provided in sections
115.629 to 115.646.
4. (1) The secretary of state may investigate any
suspected violation of any of the provisions of sections
115.629 to 115.646.
(2) (a) The secretary of state or an authorized
representative of the secretary of state ] (1) For the
purposes of this section, the office shall have the power to
require the production of books, papers, correspondence,
memoranda, contracts, agreements, and other records by
subpoena or otherwise when necessary to conduct an
investigation under this section. [Such powers shall be
exercised only at the specific written direction of the
secretary of state or his or her chief deputy.]
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
investigators conducting an investigation into an alleged
violation of this chapter shall not be restricted from

SB 1330 12
entering a polling place or the office of the election
authority under investigation.
[(b)] (2) If any person refuses to comply with a
subpoena issued under subdivision (1) of this subsection,
the secretary of state may seek to enforce the subpoena
before a court of competent jurisdiction to require the
production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda,
contracts, agreements, and other records. The court may
issue an order requiring the person to produce records
relating to the matter under investigation or in question.
Any person who fails to comply with the order may be held in
contempt of court.
[(c) The provisions of this subdivision shall expire
on August 28, 2025.]
4. If, during the course of an investigation, the
office determines that there may be a violation of any
criminal law or a provision of this chapter, the findings of
the investigation shall be submitted to the attorney general
and the prosecuting or circuit attorney with jurisdiction
for further investigation or prosecution. This section
shall not limit the jurisdiction of any other office or
agency of the state to investigate violations of this
chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter.
5. (1) Before January fifteenth of each year, the
office shall submit a report to the governor, the speaker of
the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of
the senate, and the house of representatives and senate
committees with jurisdiction over elections that details
each investigation of alleged violations of this chapter
conducted during the previous calendar year. The report
shall include the following:
(a) The total number of complaints received;

SB 1330 13
(b) The number of independent investigations initiated
or dismissed; and
(c) The number of complaints referred to another
agency for further investigation or prosecution.
(2) For each complaint or investigation listed in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the report shall detail:
(a) The source of the alleged violation;
(b) The law or rule allegedly violated and the nature
of the alleged violation;
100 (c) The county in which the alleged violation occurred;
101 (d) Whether the alleged violation was dismissed or
102 referred to another agency for further investigation or
103 prosecution and if so, to which agency; and
104 (e) The current status of the investigation or
105 resulting criminal case.
106 6. The attorney general shall have statewide
107 investigative authority and shall have concurrent authority
108 with the appropriate prosecuting or circuit attorney over
109 all violations of the provisions of sections 115.629 to
110 115.646.
115.1500. 1. As used in this section, the term
"communications" means federal directive or guidance
communicated to the state of Missouri through telephonic or
electronic means, through the mail, or through in-person
contact pertaining to elections, including the times,
places, and manner for carrying out elections in Missouri,
received on or after the effective date of this section, by
any state agency or person, group, or entity charged by the
state to administer any official election occurring within
the state. This includes, but is not limited to, any
guidance issued by the United States Department of Justice

SB 1330 14
or any other federal executive agency related to new or
existing voting or election laws or procedures.
2. Any state agency, whether that agency is involved
in elections or not, or any person, group, or entity charged
by the state to administer any official election occurring
within the state, who receives or responds to a
communication from the United States Department of Justice
or any other federal executive branch agency related to new
or existing voting or election laws, shall provide notice to
the governor and general assembly of this communication
within five business days.
3. The notice requirement in subsection 2 of this
section shall be presumed to have been met based on the
postmarked date on each letter sent to the governor and
general assembly, through certified mail, outlining the
communication the agency, person, group, or entity received
from or responded to the United States Department of Justice
or any other federal executive agency.
115.1505. 1. As used in this section, the term "new
federal election guidance" means any federal directive or
guidance pertaining to elections including the times,
places, and manner for carrying out elections in Missouri
received on or after the effective date of this section, by
a person, group, or entity charged by the state to
administer any official election occurring within Missouri.
This includes, but is not limited to, any guidance issued by
the United States Department of Justice or any other federal
executive agency related to new or existing voting or
election laws.
2. Any person, group, or entity charged by the state
of Missouri to administer any official election occurring
within the state who intends to implement any new federal

SB 1330 15
election guidance pending approval from the general assembly
pursuant to this section, shall provide notice to the
general assembly of its intent to do so at least thirty days
before implementing the guidance.
3. All new federal election guidance shall be approved
by concurrent resolution approved by a majority of each
house of the general assembly before it is implemented by
any person, group, or entity charged by the state to
administer any official election occurring within the state.
4. It shall be presumed for purposes of compliance
with this section that the general assembly has approved the
implementation of the new federal election guidance if the
general assembly fails to vote on a concurrent resolution
described in subsection 3 of this section within thirty days
from when notice is provided to the general assembly
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section.
5. A violation of this section shall result in a fine
in the amount of five thousand dollars to be levied every
thirty days until the implemented guidance is formally
withdrawn.
115.1510. 1. As used in this section, the term "new
federal election funds" shall mean any federal funds
received on or after the effective date of this section, by
a person, group, or entity charged by the state of Missouri
to administer any official election occurring within the
state.
2. Any person, group, or entity charged by the state
to administer any official election occurring within
Missouri who intends to accept or disperse federal election
funds pending approval from the general assembly pursuant to
this section, shall provide notice to the general assembly
of its intent to do so at least thirty days before accepting

SB 1330 16
the funds. If funds have already been accepted, then notice
shall be provided to the general assembly thirty days before
the funds are dispersed.
3. All new federal election funds shall be approved by
concurrent resolution approved by a majority of each house
of the general assembly before they may be accepted or
dispersed by a person, group, or entity charged by the state
to administer any official election occurring within the
state.
4. It shall be presumed for purposes of compliance
with this section that the general assembly has approved the
acceptance and dispersal of new federal election funds if
the general assembly fails to vote on a concurrent
resolution described in subsection 3 of this section within
thirty days from when notice is provided to the general
assembly in accordance with subsection 2 of this section.
5. A violation of this section shall result in a fine
in the amount of the new federal election funds accepted or
dispersed in violation of this section plus an additional
one thousand dollars.
[115.074. 1. Subject to appropriation
from federal funds, the secretary of state shall
administer a grant, loan, or other aid program
for the purposes of providing funds to election
authorities to upgrade or improve the voting
process or equipment. Such funding may be in
the form of matching grants. The secretary of
state when awarding grants shall give priority
to jurisdictions which have the highest number
of residents according to the most recent
federal census, with an income below the federal
poverty level as established by the federal
department of health and human services or its
successor agency. The secretary of state may
promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of
this section.

SB 1330 17
2. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested
with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be invalid
and void.]
[115.078. 1. There is hereby created in
the state treasury the "Election Administration
Improvements Fund", which shall consist of
appropriations from the general assembly, any
gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests
received from federal, private, or other sources
for the purpose of improving the administration
of elections within Missouri, including making
payments of election costs as required under
sections 115.065 and 115.077. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and
shall make disbursements from the fund in
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180.
Money in the fund shall be used exclusively for
election administration improvements as directed
by the secretary of state, and to meet the
state's obligations under sections 115.065 and
115.077. No moneys obtained through the
provisions of this section shall be made a part
of the general operating budget of an election
authority, or used to supplant other federal,
state, or local funds expended for elections.
The secretary of state may transfer moneys from
the fund to the election improvements revolving
loan fund as the secretary deems necessary to
facilitate compliance with the Help America Vote
Act of 2002. Notwithstanding section 33.080 to
the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund

SB 1330 18
at the end of any biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the general revenue fund. All
yield, interest, income, increment, or gain
received from time deposit of moneys in the
state treasury to the credit of the fund shall
be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, no amount of
moneys in the fund shall be transferred from the
fund or charged for purposes of the
administration of central services for the state
of Missouri.
2. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Election Improvements Revolving
Loan Fund", which shall consist of all moneys
appropriated to it by the general assembly, all
repayment of moneys from eligible lenders and
any moneys deposited or transferred to the fund
for the purpose of improving the administration
of elections through loans. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund and shall make
disbursements from the fund in accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180. Money in the fund
shall be used solely for improving the
administration of elections through loans.
Notwithstanding section 33.080 to the contrary,
any moneys remaining in the fund shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue
fund. All yield, interest, income, increment,
or gain received from time deposit of moneys in
the state treasury to the credit of the fund
shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, no amount
of moneys in the fund shall be transferred from
the fund or charged for purposes of the
administration of central services for the state
of Missouri. The secretary of state is
authorized to administer the fund in accordance
with this section and the Help America Vote Act
of 2002, and to promulgate rules to execute this
section. No rule or portion of a rule
promulgated pursuant to the authority of this
section shall become effective unless it has
been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.]

SB 1330 19
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective January 1, 2027.
✓